North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-15 Tax Levies and Limitations
57-15-61.
Economic growth districts.

In counties that are part of a joint job development authority, an economic growth district may be established by resolution approved by the board of county commissioners of each county that will be part of the economic growth district. The resolution approved by each board of county commissioners must specify which of the counties in the economic growth district will have the responsibility to administer the economic growth increment pool, unless the boards of county commissioners otherwise agree in writing to different terms and conditions.

Upon establishment of an economic growth district, the auditor of each county in the economic growth district shall compute and certify the taxable value of each lot or parcel of commercial property, as defined in section 57-02-01, in that county as most recently assessed and equalized. In each subsequent year, the county auditor of each county in an economic growth district shall compute and certify the amount by which the taxable valuation of all commercial lots and parcels of real property in that county, as most recently assessed and equalized, has increased in comparison with the original taxable value of all commercial lots and parcels. The amount of increase determined is the gross commercial growth of that county. If there is a decrease or no increase in gross commercial growth, the auditor shall certify the gross commercial growth as zero. The auditor shall compute and certify the net commercial growth of the county as thirty percent of the gross commercial growth.

The county auditor of each county in an economic growth district shall exclude the net commercial growth determined under subsection 1 from the taxable valuation upon which the auditor computes the mill rates of taxes levied in that year by the state and every political subdivision having power to levy taxes on the property. The auditor shall extend the aggregate mill rate against the net commercial growth as well as the taxable valuation upon which the aggregate mill rate was determined. The amount of taxes received from application of the aggregate mill rate against the net commercial growth is the economic growth increment revenue for that year.

The county auditor of each county in an economic growth district shall segregate all economic growth increment revenue in a special fund.

The county treasurer shall remit the economic growth increment revenue to the county auditor of the county that administers the economic growth increment pool when the county treasurer distributes collected taxes to the state and to political subdivisions.

Before annual certification of county tax levies to the county auditor, the county auditor in the county that administers the economic growth increment pool shall distribute to the county auditors of the other counties in the economic growth district the proportion of the economic growth increment pool which the population of the receiving county bears to the total population of all counties in the economic growth district. Revenue received by a county under this subsection must be deposited in the county general fund.

An economic growth district may be dissolved by discontinuation of a joint job development authority or by approval of a resolution by the board of county commissioners of each county in the economic growth district. Upon dissolution of an economic growth district, any funds remaining in the economic growth increment pool must be distributed in accordance with subsection 5.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 98, § 6.

57-15-62.
Levy authorized for county automation and telecommunications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 501, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-15-63.
Mistake in levy — Levy increase in later year — Levy reverts. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2003, ch. 517, § 2.

57-15-63.1.
Mistake in levy — Levy increase in later year — Levy reverts. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2007, ch. 508, § 2.

57-15-63.2.
Mistake in township levy — Levy increase in later year — Levy reverts. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2009, ch. 537, § 1.